apertium-bak.bak.lexc
LEXICON V-PERS-VOLITIONAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}ҙ CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of N-INFL-COMMON.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

! FIXME: duplicated code here. GER-CASE-NO_COPULA, for instance, is the same thing as "CasesWithoutCopulas" cont.class

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{N%}%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{N%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASE ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+hыҙ%<post%>:%>h%{I%}ҙ GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GER-GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%}%{I%}%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} GER-ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}ҙ GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER_FUT3-POSS-REAL

GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON ;
%<px3sp%>: GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL

GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSS-REAL ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-FUT

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}ҫ V-PERS-S1-NO1SG ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}ҫ%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! Dir/LR

%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>м%{A%}ҫ V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{I%}рл%{I%}%{K%} # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}ҫл%{I%}%{K%} # ;

%<ger_fut%>:%>%{I%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>м%{A%}ҫ GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{I%}рл%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}ҫл%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<inf%>:%>%{I%}рг%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<inf%>:%>м%{A%}ҫк%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<pres%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRESENT ;
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<fut2%>:%>%{j%}%{A%}с%{A%}%{K%} V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>м%{A%}й%{е%}нс%{A%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>м%{A%}й CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;       ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>м%{A%}йс%{A%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;      ! Dir/LR

%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<neg%>%<prc_impf%>:%>м%{A%}й%{е%}нс%{A%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<neg%>%<prc_impf%>:%>м%{A%}й CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;       ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<prc_impf%>:%>м%{A%}йс%{A%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;      ! Dir/LR

%<prc_vol%>:%>%{E%}һ%{I%} V-PERS-VOLITIONAL ;   ! FIXME:NOTE: this is the first type of volitative
                                    ! participle in Bashkir (see comment for <prc_vol> tag above).
                                    ! Former it was called <ger8>.
                                    ! A transfer rule to match bashkir prc_vol2 to tatar prc_vol is needed. /I.S./

%<prc_fplan%>:%>м%{A%}ҡс%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>м%{A%}й%{е%}нс%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>м%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;       ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>м%{A%}йс%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;      ! Dir/LR

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нс%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR FIXME check

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_fut3%>:%>%{E%}һ%{I%} V-ADJ ;

! Gerunds
%<ger1%>:%>м%{A%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_fut3%>:%>%{E%}һ%{I%} GER_FUT3-POSS-REAL ;

%<fut_plan%>:%>м%{A%}ҡс%{I%} V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_cond%>:%>һ%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>һ%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}с CLITICS-NO-COP ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}% торған V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>%{ger%}%{U%}с%{е%} V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_fut2%>:%>%{j%}%{A%}с%{A%}%{K%} V-ADJ ;

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>%{ger%}%{U%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>%{ger%}%{U%}%>с%{e%}%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_fut2%>:%>%{j%}%{A%}с%{A%}%{K%} GER-POSS-REAL ;

! Imperatives
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-AFTER-IMP-SG ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ  CLITICS-AFTER-IMP-PL ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ  CLITICS-AFTER-IMP-PL ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ  CLITICS-AFTER-IMP-PL ;

! Optative/jussive forms

%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%{A%}й%{I%}м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>һ%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}ҡ CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>һ%{I%}нд{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON V-COMMON-PASSIVE

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT ;

LEXICON V-DER

!%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-COMMON ;
!%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-FUT ;

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-COMMON ;
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-FUT ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;

!LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS

!%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

!LEXICON V-TV-PASS

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-FUT ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;
V-COMMON-PASSIVE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     Auxiliary verbs

LEXICON VAUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ;
%<vaux%>: V-FUT ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     Copula

LEXICON COP-I

и%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:икән GER-POSS-REAL ;
и%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:икән%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSS-REAL ;

и%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:икән V-PERS-S1 ;
и%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:түгел% икән V-PERS-S1 ;

и%<cop%>%<ifi%>:и%>не V-PERS-S2 ;

и%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:түгел V-PERS-S1 ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-P12SG-CASES

%<nom%>:ин CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gen%>:инең CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:иңә CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:ине CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:инән CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:индә CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<px%>:инеке%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:индә ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:индәй CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<adv%>:инеңсә CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASES-ETC ;

 LEXICON Verbs
кил:кил VAUX ; ! ""
ал:ал VAUX ; ! ""
йоҡла:йоҡла V-IV ; ! ""
ярат:ярат V-TV ; ! ""
көт:көт V-TV ; ! ""
үт:үт V-TV ; ! ""
эс:эс V-TV ; ! ""
йырла:йырла V-TV ; ! ""
әйт:әйт V-TV ; ! ""
сис:сис V-TV ; ! ""
иҫкә% төшөр:иҫкә% төшөр V-TV ; ! ""
ҡысҡыр:ҡысҡыр V-TV ; ! ""
күҙ% алдына% килтер:күҙ% алдына% килтер V-TV ; ! ""
ал:ал V-TV ; ! ""
ал:ал V-TV ; ! ""
алып% бар:алып% бар V-TV ; ! ""
ғүмер% ит:ғүмер% ит V-IV ; ! ""
кит:кит%{ъ%} V-IV ; ! ""
мен:мен V-IV ; ! ""
ет:ет V-IV ; ! ""
күҙ% ташла:күҙ% ташла V-IV ; ! ""
бул:бул V-IV ; ! ""
ҡал:ҡал V-IV ; ! ""
ултыр:ултыр V-IV ; ! ""
кит:кит%{ъ%} V-IV ; ! ""
ҡайт:ҡайт V-IV ; ! ""
бул:бул V-IV ; ! ""
тура% кил:тура% кил V-IV ; ! ""
йылмай:йылмай V-IV ; ! ""
ышан:ышан V-IV ; ! ""
кит:кит%{ъ%} V-IV ; ! ""
тура% кил:тура% кил V-IV ; ! ""
мөнәсәбәте% бул:мөнәсәбәте% бул V-IV ; ! ""
өлгөр:өлгөр V-IV ; ! ""
билдәлә:билдәлә V-TV ; ! ""
бөт:бөт V-IV ; ! ""
планлаштыр:планлаштыр V-TV ; ! ""
тикшерен:тикшерен V-IV ; ! ""
фаразла:фаразла V-TV ; ! ""
сәләмлә:сәләмлә V-TV ; ! ""
алмаш:алмаш V-IV ; ! ""
ашырыл:ашырыл V-IV ; ! ""
башҡар:башҡар V-TV ; ! ""
башҡарыл:башҡарыл V-IV ; ! ""
бысран:бысран V-IV ; ! ""
тасуирла:тасуирла V-TV ; ! ""
белен:белен V-IV ; ! ""
бинтла:бинтла V-TV ; ! ""
буша:буша V-IV ; ! ""
гудронла:гудронла V-TV ; ! ""
дәртлән:дәртлән V-IV ; ! ""
исемлән:исемлән V-IV ; ! ""
йомарла:йомарла V-TV ; ! ""
йәшәр:йәшәр V-IV ; ! ""
кислә:кислә V-IV ; ! ""
ҡапша:ҡапша V-TV ; ! ""
ҡарҡылда:ҡарҡылда V-IV ; ! ""
мәшәҡәтлән:мәшәҡәтлән V-IV ; ! ""
осла:осла V-TV ; ! ""
сатанла:сатанла V-IV ; ! ""
сәйнә:сәйнә V-TV ; ! ""
терәл:терәл V-IV ; ! ""
тиш:тиш V-TV ; ! ""
төплән:төплән V-IV ; ! ""
тырмала:тырмала V-TV ; ! ""
үрмәлә:үрмәлә V-IV ; ! ""
һөйрә:һөйрә V-TV ; ! ""
шаула:шаула V-IV ; ! ""
эйәр:эйәр V-IV ; ! ""
әҙерлә:әҙерлә V-TV ; ! ""
әрләш:әрләш V-IV ; ! ""
яра:яра V-IV ; ! ""
ауыш:ауыш V-IV ; ! ""
аталан:аталан V-IV ; ! ""
алға% ебәр:алға% ебәр V-TV ; ! ""
арала:арала V-TV ; ! ""
аталан:аталан V-IV ; ! ""
асы:асы V-TV ; ! ""
баҡыр% әйберҙәр:баҡыр% әйберҙәр V-IV ; ! ""
бәйлә:бәйлә V-TV ; ! ""
биҙән:биҙән V-IV ; ! ""
ботарла:ботарла V-TV ; ! ""
булыш:булыш V-IV ; ! ""
бүлеп% ҡара:бүлеп% ҡара V-TV ; ! ""
ғәйеп% таҡ:ғәйеп% таҡ V-IV ; ! ""
тиҫтәлә:тиҫтәлә V-TV ; ! ""
тулҡынлан:тулҡынлан V-IV ; ! ""
яуап% бир:яуап% бир V-TV ; ! ""
жайын% тап:жайын% тап V-IV ; ! ""
етештер:етештер V-TV ; ! ""
йыһазлан:йыһазлан V-IV ; ! ""
и:и V-TV ; ! ""
имгән:имгән V-IV ; ! ""
иҫкә% ал:иҫкә% ал V-TV ; ! ""
йөҙгәндә:йөҙгәндә V-TV ; ! ""
йугәнһеҙҙәр:йугәнһеҙҙәр V-IV ; ! ""
казы:казы V-TV ; ! ""
ҡалыптан:ҡалыптан V-IV ; ! ""
ҡаптыр:ҡаптыр V-TV ; ! ""
әйтерһең% дә% был:әйтерһең% дә% был V-IV ; ! ""
килеп% ет:килеп% ет V-TV ; ! ""
кисек:кисек V-IV ; ! ""
ҡоралландыры:ҡоралландыры V-TV ; ! ""
куан:куан V-IV ; ! ""
ағас% бәшмәге:ағас% бәшмәге V-TV ; ! ""
күнек:күнек V-IV ; ! ""
ҡыҙыҡһындыр:ҡыҙыҡһындыр V-TV ; ! ""
кейәүгә% сыҡмаған% ҡыҙ% кал:кейәүгә% сыҡмаған% ҡыҙ% кал V-IV ; ! ""
майҙа:майҙа V-TV ; ! ""
мәш% кил:мәш% кил V-IV ; ! ""
нескәртә:нескәртә V-TV ; ! ""
оеш:оеш V-IV ; ! ""
өйрәт:өйрәт V-TV ; ! ""
пеш:пеш V-IV ; ! ""
реконструкцияла:реконструкцияла V-TV ; ! ""
саташ:саташ V-IV ; ! ""
һелкет:һелкет V-TV ; ! ""
сендер:сендер V-TV ; ! ""
оран% сук:оран% сук V-IV ; ! ""
сүк:сүк V-TV ; ! ""
сыйыш:сыйыш V-IV ; ! ""
табыштыр:табыштыр V-TV ; ! ""
таптан:таптан V-IV ; ! ""
тара:тара V-TV ; ! ""
тетрә:тетрә V-IV ; ! ""
тешлә:тешлә V-TV ; ! ""
тирбәт:тирбәт V-TV ; ! ""
тирәләй:тирәләй V-IV ; ! ""
төплә:төплә V-TV ; ! ""
төш:төш V-IV ; ! ""
тупла:тупла V-TV ; ! ""
тыныслан:тыныслан V-IV ; ! ""
ултырт:ултырт V-TV ; ! ""
үҙгәр:үҙгәр V-IV ; ! ""
хастан:хастан V-IV ; ! ""
хырылдап:хырылдап V-TV ; ! ""
хыяллан:хыяллан V-IV ; ! ""
сирҙән:сирҙән V-IV ; ! ""
сүмәләләй:сүмәләләй V-TV ; ! ""
шалтыра:шалтыра V-IV ; ! ""
шыптырҙа:шыптырҙа V-IV ; ! ""
юҡ% иттер:юҡ% иттер V-TV ; ! ""
ябыҡ:ябыҡ V-IV ; ! ""
яманташ:яманташ V-IV ; ! ""
ярлыҡа:ярлыҡа V-TV ; ! ""
әҫәрлән:әҫәрлән V-IV ; ! ""
дөрлә:дөрлә V-IV ; ! ""
киңәйт:киңәйт V-TV ; ! ""
әшнәләш:әшнәләш V-IV ; ! ""
рәтлә:рәтлә V-TV ; ! ""
ҡайна:ҡайна V-IV ; ! ""
үпкәлә:үпкәлә V-IV ; ! ""
түбәлә:түбәлә V-TV ; ! ""
төрлән:төрлән V-IV ; ! ""
үсеклә:үсеклә V-TV ; ! ""
выжылда:выжылда V-TV ; ! ""
эләгеш:эләгеш V-TV ; ! ""
нишлә:нишлә V-TV ; ! ""
сиклә:сиклә V-TV ; ! ""
хәрбиләштер:хәрбиләштер V-TV ; ! ""
зыңла:зыңла V-TV ; ! ""
шапылда:шапылда V-TV ; ! ""
телән:телән V-TV ; ! ""
ҡәнәғәтләндер:ҡәнәғәтләндер V-TV ; ! ""
эйәр:эйәр V-TV ; ! ""
ялма:ялма V-TV ; ! ""
лаҡылда:лаҡылда V-TV ; ! ""
ҡарҡылда:ҡарҡылда V-TV ; ! ""
хәтерлә:хәтерлә V-TV ; ! ""
